Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2324
Appeal of sentence by prosecutor; credit for time served.

If a more severe sentence is imposed by the appellate court or on remand, any time served on the sentence appealed from shall be deemed to have been served on the new sentence imposed under subdivision (1) of section 29-2323.

Laws 1982, LB 402, § 6;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 86.